West Virginia, session 2026, HB5570.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. PURPOSES, DEFINITIONS AND EXEMPTIONS. §24A-1-3. Exemptions from chapter. The provisions of this chapter, except where specifically otherwise provided, do not apply to:(1) Motor vehicles operated exclusively in the transportation of United States mail or in the transportation of newspapers: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission;(2) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States of America, the State of West Virginia or any county, municipality or county board of education, urban mass transportation authority established and maintained pursuant to §8-27-1 et seq. of this code or by any of their departments, and any motor vehicles operated under a contract with a county board of education exclusively for the transportation of children to and from school or other legitimate transportation for the schools as the commission may specifically authorize;(3) Motor vehicles used exclusively in the transportation of agricultural or horticultural products, livestock, poultry and dairy products from the farm or orchard on which they are raised or produced to markets, processing plants, packing houses, canneries, railway shipping points and cold storage plants, and in the transportation of agricultural or horticultural supplies to farms or orchards where they are to be used: Provided, That the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision and are also operated by common carriers by motor vehicle or contract carriers by motor vehicle, and their operators are subject to the safety and insurance rules promulgated by the commission;(4) Motor vehicles used exclusively in the transportation of human or animal excreta;(5) Motor vehicles used exclusively in ambulance service or duly chartered rescue squad service;(6) Motor vehicles used exclusively for volunteer fire department service;(7) Motor vehicles used exclusively in the transportation of coal from mining operations to loading facilities for further shipment by rail or water carriers: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission and the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision and are also operated by common carriers by motor vehicle or contract carriers by motor vehicle, and their operators are subject to the insurance rules promulgated by the commission;(8) Motor vehicles used by petroleum commission agents and oil distributors solely for the transportation of petroleum products and related automotive products when the transportation is incidental to the business of selling the products: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission and the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision and are also operated by common carriers by motor vehicle or contract carriers by motor vehicle, and their operators are subject to the insurance rules promulgated by the commission;(9) Motor vehicles owned, leased by or leased to any person and used exclusively for the transportation of processed source-separated recycled materials generated by commercial, institutional and industrial customers, transported free of charge or by a nonprofit recycling cooperative association in accordance with §19-4-1(d)(1) of this code from the customers to a facility for further processing: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators shall be subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission and the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision and are also operated by common carriers by motor vehicle or contract carriers by motor vehicle, and their operators are subject to the insurance rules promulgated by the commission;(10) Motor vehicles specifically preempted from state economic regulation of intrastate motor carrier operations by the provisions of 49 U. S. C. §14501 as amended by Title I, Section 103 of the federal Interstate Commerce Commission Termination Act of 1995: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety regulations promulgated by the commission and the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision and are also operated by common carriers by motor vehicle or contract carriers by motor vehicle, and their operators are subject to the insurance rules promulgated by the commission;(11) Motor vehicles designated by the West Virginia Bureau of Senior Services for use and operation by local county aging programs: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission;(12) Motor vehicles designated by the West Virginia Division of Public Transit operated by organizations that receive federal grants from the Federal Transit Administration: Provided, That the vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety and insurance rules promulgated by the commission; (13) Motor vehicles used exclusively in the nonemergency medical transportation of Medicaid members including those under contract with any broker authorized by the Bureau for Medical Services: Provided, That these vehicles and their operators shall be subject to the safety rules promulgated by the commission; (14) Common carriers or contract carriers engaged in the business of transporting household goods and motor vehicles used exclusively in the transportation of household goods; (15) Common carriers or contract carriers engaged in the business of transporting scrap tires, waste tires, or other used tires to storage, disposal, or recycling locations; or(16) Motor vehicles operated under a contract with the West Virginia Department of Environmental Protection exclusively for the cleanup and transportation of waste tires generated from state authorized waste tire remediation or cleanup projects: Provided, That the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision, and their operators, are subject to the safety and insurance rules promulgated by the commission.(17) Luxury limousine service: Provided, That luxury limousine service vehicles and their operators are subject to the safety rules and insurance requirements promulgated by the commission.(18) Common carriers or contract carriers engaged in the business of transporting solid waste for commercial or industrial customers to disposal or recycling locations: Provided, That the vehicles that are exempted by this subdivision, and their operators, are subject to the safety and insurance rules promulgated by the commission.